Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2179.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5380XS (5) 91 sb/js S.F. 2179 Section 1. Section 455C.1, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 1. âBeverageâ means wine as defined in section 123.3, 3 subsection 53 , alcoholic liquor as defined in section 123.3, 4 subsection 4 , beer as defined in section 123.3, subsection 5 6 , high alcoholic content beer as defined in section 123.3, 6 subsection 22 , canned cocktail as defined in section 123.3, 7 subsection 10 , mineral water, soda water, and similar 8 carbonated soft drinks or noncarbonated water, and all 9 nonalcoholic carbonated or noncarbonated drinks in liquid form 10 and intended for human consumption , except for unflavored rice 11 milk, unflavored soy milk, milk, and dairy-derived products . 12 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act takes effect July 1, 2027. 13